Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.330

Miscellaneous state funds—Moneys transferred to accounts in the state treasury.

All moneys to the credit of the following state funds on the first day of August, 1955, and all moneys thereafter paid to the state treasurer for or to the credit of such funds, are hereby transferred to the following accounts in the state treasury, the creation of which is hereby authorized:

(1) Capitol building construction fund moneys, to the capitol building construction account;

(2) Cemetery account moneys, to the cemetery account;

(3) Feed and fertilizer fund moneys, to the feed and fertilizer account;

(4) Forest development fund moneys, to the forest development account;

(5) Harbor improvement fund moneys, to the harbor improvement account;

(6) Millersylvania Park current fund moneys, to the Millersylvania Park current account;

(7) Real estate commission fund moneys, to the real estate commission account;

(8) Reclamation revolving fund moneys, to the reclamation revolving account;

(9) University of Washington building fund moneys, to the University of Washington building account; and

(10) State College of Washington building fund moneys, to the Washington State University building account.

[ 2008 c 128 s 18; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 3; 1985 c 57 s 38; 1981 c 242 s 3; 1980 c 32 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 67 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.330. Prior: 1959 c 273 s 6; 1957 c 115 s 6; 1955 c 370 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 128 ss 17-20: See note following RCW 88.16.061.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.

Effective dates—1981 c 242: "Sections 1, 2, and 4 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1981. Section 3 of this act shall take effect September 1, 1981." [ 1981 c 242 s 5.]

Effective date—1980 c 32 s 3: "Section 3 of this act shall take effect September 1, 1981." [ 1980 c 32 s 4.]

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 67: See note following RCW 19.28.351.